Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a review of Washington's riparian programs and report to the legislature by June 1, 2027, with a preliminary report due December 1, 2025.(2) The report must include:(a) A list of funded riparian programs including the entities eligible under each program, local match amounts and maximum grant amounts allowed under each program, current and recent past funding amounts of each program, and a review of the effectiveness for each program; and(b) Any recommendations related to continuing, enhancing, consolidating, or eliminating programs, and any changes that would increase access to funding, remove administrative burdens, or increase the effectiveness, usefulness, or both, of each program.(3) This section expires July 1, 2028.--- END ---